Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202537-351
Nebraska Outdoor Recreation Development Cash Fund; created; investment.

There is hereby created a fund to be known as the Nebraska Outdoor Recreation Development Cash Fund. The fund shall contain the money received pursuant to section 77-2602 and any funds donated as gifts, bequests, or other contributions to such fund from public or private entities. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Nebraska Outdoor Recreation Development Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1978, LB 109, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-1303;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 109;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 18;

Laws 2025, LB264, § 125.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.